Utah statutes.
41-12a-804.   Notice -- Proof -- Revocation of registration -- False
statements -- Penalties -- Exemptions -- Sales tax enforcement.
(1)  If the comparison under Section 41-12a-803 shows that a motor vehicle is
not insured for three consecutive months, the Motor Vehicle Division shall
direct that the designated agent provide notice to the owner of the motor
vehicle that the owner has 15 days to provide:
(a)  proof of owner's or operator's security in a form allowed under
Subsection 41-12a-303.2(2)(b); or
(b)  proof of exemption from the owner's or operator's security requirements.
(2)  If an owner of a motor vehicle fails to provide satisfactory proof of
owner's or operator's security to the designated agent, the designated agent
shall:
(a)  provide a second notice to the owner of the motor vehicle that the owner
now has 15 days to provide:
(i)  proof of owner's or operator's security in a form allowed under
Subsection 41-12a-303.2(2)(b); or
(ii)  proof of exemption from the owner's or operator's security requirements;
(b)  for each notice provided, indicate information relating to the owner's
failure to provide proof of owner's or operator's security in the database;
and
(c)  provide this information to state and local law enforcement agencies as
requested in accordance with the provisions under Section 41-12a-805.
(3)  The Motor Vehicle Division:
(a)  shall revoke the registration upon receiving notification under
Subsection 41-1a-110(2);
(b)  shall provide appropriate notices of the revocation, the legal
consequences of operating a vehicle with revoked registration and without
owner's or operator's security and instructions on how to get the registration
reinstated; and
(c)  may direct the designated agent to provide the notices under this
Subsection (3).
(4)  Any action by the Motor Vehicle Division to revoke the registration of a
motor vehicle under this section may be in addition to an action by a law
enforcement agency to impose the penalties under Section 41-12a-302 or
41-12a-303.2.
(5) (a)  A person may not provide a false or fraudulent statement to the Motor
Vehicle Division or designated agent.
(b)  In addition to any other penalties, a person who violates Subsection
(5)(a) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(6)  The department and the Motor Vehicle Division shall direct the designated
agent to exempt from this section a farm truck that:
(a)  meets the definition of a farm truck under Section 41-1a-102; and
(b)  is registered as a farm truck under Title 41, Chapter 1a, Motor Vehicle
Act.
(7)  This part does not affect other actions or penalties that may be taken or
imposed for violation of the owner's and operator's security requirements of
this chapter.
(8)  If a comparison under Section 41-12a-803 shows that a motor vehicle may
not be in compliance with motor vehicle registration or sales and use tax
laws, the Motor Vehicle Division may direct that the designated agent provide
notice to the owner of a motor vehicle that information exists which indicates
the possible violation.
